California statutes. Public Resources Code
(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Initial Board of Directors [9201. - 9206.]

9201.

The initial board of directors of a district formed on or after January 1, 1992, shall be determined pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

9202.

In the case of a district which contains only unincorporated territory in a single county, the district board may be elected or may be appointed by the county board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

9203.

In the case of a district which contains only unincorporated territory in more than one county, the district board may be elected or may be appointed by the boards of supervisors of the counties in which the district is located. If the district board is appointed by the boards of supervisors, they shall appoint directors according to the proportionate share of population of that portion of each county within the district, provided that each board of supervisors shall appoint at least one director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

9204.

In the case of a district which contains unincorporated territory and the territory of one or more cities, the district board may be elected or appointed by the county board of supervisors and the city councils in which the district is located. If the district board is to be appointed, the board of supervisors and the city council or councils shall appoint directors according to the proportionate share of population of that portion of the county and each city within the district, provided that the board of supervisors and each city council shall appoint at least one director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

9205.

In the case of a district which includes only incorporated territory within a single city, the district board may be elected or appointed by the city council.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

9206.

In the case of a district which includes only incorporated territory in more than one city, the district board may be elected or appointed by the city councils in which the district is located. If the district board is appointed, the city councils shall appoint directors according to the proportionate share of population of that portion of each city within the district. However, each city council shall appoint at least one director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. District Directors [9301. - 9317.]

9301.

(a) The board of directors shall consist of five, seven, or nine directors. The number of directors may be changed by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board of directors after publication of notice of the intended change at least once in a newspaper of general circulation published in each county in which the district is located. 

(b) If the number of directors is increased, the new positions shall be treated as vacancies and shall be filled as provided in Section 9317, except that if the board of directors is appointed as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 9314, then the new positions shall be filled in the same manner pursuant to Section 9316. If the number of directors is decreased, the terms of the directors in office on the date of the resolution adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be reduced. 

(c) The directors first elected shall take office immediately upon qualifying.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

9301.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 9301, the local agency formation commission, in approving either a consolidation of districts or the reorganization of two or more districts into a single resource conservation district may, pursuant to subdivisions (k) and (n) of Section 56886 of the Government Code, increase the number of directors to serve on the board of directors of the consolidated or reorganized district to 7, 9, or 11, who shall be members of the board of directors of the districts to be consolidated or reorganized as of the effective date of the consolidation or reorganization.

(b) Upon the expiration of the terms of the members of the board of directors of the consolidated district, or a district reorganized as described in subdivision (a), whose terms first expire following the effective date of the consolidation or reorganization, the total number of members on the board of directors shall be reduced until the number equals the number of members permitted by the principal act of the consolidated or reorganized district, or any larger number as may be specified by the local agency formation commission in approving the consolidation or reorganization.

(c) In addition to the powers granted under Section 1780 of the Government Code, in the event of a vacancy on the board of directors of the consolidated district or a district reorganized as described in subdivision (a) at which time the total number of directors is greater than five, the board of directors may, by majority vote of the remaining members of the board, choose not to fill the vacancy. In that event, the total membership of the board of directors shall be reduced by one board member. Upon making the determination not to fill a vacancy, the board of directors shall notify the board of supervisors of its decision.

(d) For the purposes of this section: “consolidation” means consolidation, as defined in Section 56030 of the Government Code; “district” or “special district” means district or special district, as defined in Section 56036 of the Government Code; and “reorganization” means reorganization, as defined in Section 56073 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 172, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

9302.

Each director shall take the oath of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9303.

The directors shall receive no compensation for their services as such, but each shall be allowed reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in attendance at meetings of the directors or when otherwise engaged in the work of the district at the direction of the board of directors. The directors shall fix the amount allowed for necessary expenses, but no director shall be appointed to any position for which he or she would receive compensation as a salaried officer or employee of the district. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

9304.

No director or other officer of the district shall be interested directly or indirectly in the sale of equipment, materials, or services to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9305.

After all have qualified the directors first elected shall meet and classify themselves by lot into two classes as nearly equal in number as possible. The term of office of those in the class having the least number shall expire at noon on the last Friday in November of the next even-numbered year after the year in which the meeting is held. The term of office of those in the other class shall expire at noon on the last Friday in November of the second even-numbered year after the year in which the meeting is held.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9306.

After such classification the directors shall organize and elect a president from their number who shall serve as such at the pleasure of the directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9307.

The directors shall appoint a secretary who shall serve at the pleasure of, and whose compensation shall be fixed by, the directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9308.

The directors shall select a date, time, and place at which regular monthly meetings of the directors shall be held. Upon the completion of all the foregoing determinations by the directors, the district shall be declared to be organized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9309.

The directors may, by resolution, change the time or place of regular meeting but no such change shall be effective until after a notice of the change is published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in the principal county and in each other county in which any portion of the district lies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9310.

Special meetings of the directors may be held as required when ordered by a majority of the directors. The order shall be entered in the records of the district and five days notice of the meeting shall be given by mail by the secretary to each director not joining in the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9311.

The order for a special meeting shall specify the business to be transacted. No other business shall be transacted at a special meeting unless all of the directors are present, in which case matters not specified may be considered by unanimous consent and acted upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9312.

A majority of the directors shall constitute a quorum but on all questions requiring a vote there shall be a concurrence of at least the number constituting a quorum, except that a number less than a quorum may adjourn or adjourn to a stated time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9313.

(a) All meetings of the directors shall be open to the public. All records of the district shall be open to public inspection during business hours.

(b) A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

9314.

(a) The term of office of the directors, except those first elected, shall be four years. The expiration of the term of any director does not constitute a vacancy, and the director shall hold office until his or her successor has qualified. 

(b) (1) As an alternative to the election of directors, the board of directors may, by a resolution presented to the board of supervisors of the principal county, request the board of supervisors to appoint directors, except those first elected. In any election year, the board of directors shall file its request with the board of supervisors not later than 125 days prior to the election. A copy of the resolution shall be furnished to the official responsible for conducting the election at the time it is presented to the board of supervisors of the principal county. The board of supervisors shall appoint directors, after consultation with the board of supervisors of any other county which contains any part of the district, from those candidates who have filed an application with the board of supervisors, as prescribed by the board of supervisors. If the directors are to be appointed, a notice of election shall not be published, but a notice of vacancy shall be posted pursuant to Section 54974 of the Government Code.

(2) The resolution shall remain in effect until rescinded by the board of directors, or until a petition requesting the rescission is received by the elections official. The petition shall be signed by 5 percent of the registered voters in the district, and shall be received not later than the 120th day before the election. Upon verification by the elections official that the petition contains the requisite number of signatures, the resolution shall be rescinded.

(3) The appointment of directors by the board of supervisors does not affect the status of a district as an independent special district.

(4) If the board of supervisors does not conduct interviews of potential candidates or make an appointment within 60 days after the expiration of the term, the board of directors may make the appointment. 

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage districts to opt for the selection of directors by election, but where directors are appointed pursuant to subdivision (b), it is the intent of the Legislature that the board of supervisors solicit recommendations from within the district, including public, private, and nonprofit entities, and appoint only applicants who are determined by the board of supervisors to have a demonstrated interest in soil and water conservation. In selecting directors pursuant to subdivision (b), the board of supervisors shall endeavor to achieve balanced representation on the board of directors. To avoid undue financial burdens to districts and to thereby promote the objectives of this division, the Legislature hereby encourages counties to waive or minimize the charges for costs of elections conducted pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 939, Sec. 19.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative January 1, 1995, by Sec. 29 of Ch. 939.)
-------------------------------------------

9315.

Resignations of directors shall be made in writing to the board of supervisors of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9316.

In case of a vacancy in the office of director appointed pursuant to Section 9314, the vacancy shall be filled, as provided in Section 9314, by appointment for the unexpired term by the board of supervisors of the principal county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

9317.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a vacancy in the office of a director who has been elected shall be filled pursuant to Section 1780 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 9178.5 by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. General District Elections [9351. - 9359.]

9351.

“General district election” is the district election required to be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each even-numbered year, at which a successor shall be chosen for each director whose term of office expires in that month.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9352.

(a) Directors shall be registered voters in the state. 

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (d), directors shall (1) reside within the district and either own real property in the district or alternatively have served, pursuant to the district’s rules, for two years or more as an associate director providing advisory or other assistance to the board of directors, or (2) be a designated agent of a resident landowner within the district. 

(c) If the board of directors has provided for selection of directors by division, these residency requirements shall apply to the division the director represents, rather than to the district as a whole. 

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that the primary function of the Suisun Resource Conservation District and Grasslands Resource Conservation District in maintaining wildlife and wetland habitats will be impaired unless there is adequate opportunity for participation by landowners on the boards of directors of those districts. The Legislature further finds and declares that, because of the natural conditions prevailing in the territory of those districts, the majority of privately owned lands therein are owned by persons residing outside the districts. Therefore, owners of land within the Suisun Resource Conservation District and Grasslands Resource Conservation District, or their agents, may serve on the respective boards of directors thereof, regardless of whether they are residents of the district. For purposes of this subdivision, ownership of land shall be determined from the last equalized assessment roll of the county or counties within which the district is situated.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

9353.

Except as otherwise provided in the chapter, districts governed by this chapter are subject to the provisions of the Uniform District Election Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9354.

Elected directors shall qualify within 20 days from the date of receipt of their certificates of election by taking the oath.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 994, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9355.

The directors so elected and qualified shall take office at noon on the last Friday in November following their election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9356.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), directors shall be elected at large.

(b) A district may, by ordinance, provide for the election of directors by division. In order to reduce election costs, the divisions shall be established along the boundaries of existing voting precincts. Prior to adopting an ordinance pursuant to this subdivision, the text of the proposed ordinance, including proposed division boundaries, shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, together with notice of the hearing at which the ordinance will be considered. At the time stated in the notice for the hearing, the board of directors shall consider the proposal and shall hear any and all objections thereto. If, after the hearing, the board determines it to be in the best interests of the district, it shall adopt the ordinance as proposed or as amended at the hearing. Directors in office at the time of adoption of the ordinance shall remain in office until the next general district election, at which a director shall be elected to each division established by the ordinance. The directors elected at that election shall meet and classify themselves by lot into two classes as nearly equal in number as possible. The term of office of those in the class having the least number shall expire at noon on the last Friday in November of the next even-numbered year after the year in which the meeting is held. The term of office of those in the other class shall expire at noon on the last Friday in November of the second even-numbered year after the year in which the meeting is held.

(c) If it is proposed to change the number of directors of a district divided into divisions, or if it is proposed to change the number of divisions in a district, that change shall be conditional upon adoption by the board of directors of a new or revised ordinance under subdivision (b) and the provisions and procedures of subdivision (b) shall be applicable thereto.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c), in any district in which directors are appointed pursuant to Section 9314 or 9316, the board of supervisors of the principal county shall make the appointments by division, as called for in the ordinance adopted pursuant to subdivision (b), and those appointments shall become effective, and the terms of existing directors shall expire, on the same date as if the directors were elected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1279, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9357.

Members of county boards of supervisors shall not be eligible to simultaneously hold office as a district director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

9358.

Nomination of candidates shall be in writing and signed by at least five landowners of the district. Nominations shall be filed with the county elections official of the principal county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 811, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9359.

Except as election of directors by division may be provided pursuant to Section 9356, all registered voters in a district shall be qualified electors and eligible to vote in district elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. General Powers of District [9401. - 9420.]

9401.

The board of directors of a district shall manage and conduct the business and affairs of the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9402.

The directors shall be empowered to conduct surveys, investigations, and research relating to the conservation of resources and the preventive and control measures and works of improvement needed, publish the results of such surveys, investigations, or research, and disseminate information concerning such preventive control measures and works of improvement; provided, however, that in order to avoid duplication of surveys, investigations, and research activities, the directors shall seek the cooperation of local, state, and federal agencies.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9403.

The directors may accept gifts and grants of money from any source whatsoever to carry out the purposes of the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9403.5.

The directors may establish and charge fees for services provided by the district to, and upon the request of, persons or governmental entities. No fee shall exceed the cost reasonably borne by the district in providing the service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

9404.

The directors may execute all necessary contracts. They may employ such agents, officers, and employees as may be necessary, prescribe their duties, and fix their compensation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9405.

The directors may acquire by purchase, lease, contract, or gift all lands and property necessary to carry out the plans and works of the district. The directors may acquire conservation easements as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 815) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Civil Code on lands within the district. A district acquiring a conservation easement shall prepare a management plan for the easement which fully describes the intent and legal obligations respecting the easement and which shall be consistent with the goals of the State Soil Conservation Plan and other policies adopted pursuant to Section 9108.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

9406.

The directors may take conveyances, leases, contracts, or other assurances for all property acquired by the district, in the name, and for the uses and purposes, of the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9407.

The directors may sue and be sued in the name of the district and may appear in person or by counsel.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9408.

(a) The directors may cooperate and enter into contracts or agreements with the state, the United States, any county, any city, any other resource conservation or other public district in this state, any person, or the commission, in furtherance of the provisions of this division, and to that end may use any funds available to the district as provided in this chapter, and may accept and use contributions of labor, money, supplies, materials, or equipment useful for accomplishing the purposes of the district. 

(b) Districts may cooperate with counties and cities on resource issues of local concern. It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage districts to facilitate cooperation among agencies of government to address resource issues of local concern. 

(c) Districts may cooperate with federal, state, and local agencies and owners of private lands under the agreement between the California Association of Resource Conservation Districts and various public and private entities known as the coordinated resource management and planning memorandum of understanding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

9409.

The directors may make improvements or conduct operations on public lands, with the cooperation of the agency administering and having jurisdiction thereof, and on private lands, with the consent of the owners thereof, in furtherance of the prevention or control of soil erosion, water conservation and distribution, agricultural enhancement, wildlife enhancement, and erosion stabilization, including, but not limited to, terraces, ditches, levees, and dams or other structures, and the planting of trees, shrubs, grasses, or other vegetation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9410.

The directors may operate and maintain, independently or in cooperation with the United States or this state or any state agency or political subdivision or any person, any and all works constructed by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9411.

The directors may disseminate information relating to soil and water conservation and erosion stabilization, and those purposes identified in Sections 9001 and 9151, and may conduct demonstrational projects within, or adjacent to, the district on public land, with the consent of the agency administering or having jurisdiction thereof, or on private lands, with the consent of the owners thereof, independently or in cooperation with the United States, this state or any political subdivision or public district thereof, or any person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 585, Sec. 9.   (AB 1902)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9412.

Each district may provide technical assistance to private landowners or land occupants within the district to support practices that minimize soil and related resource degradation and support increased resiliency and adaptation to climate change. When in the judgment of the directors it is for the benefit of the district so to do, the directors may give assistance to a private landowner or land occupant within the district in seeds, plants, materials, and labor, and may loan or rent to that private landowner or that land occupant agricultural machinery or other equipment. Assistance shall not be given or loans shall not be made unless the landowner or land occupant receiving the aid or assistance agrees to devote and use the aid or assistance on their lands within the district in furtherance of objectives of the
 district and in accordance with district plans or regulations. Notwithstanding the fact that the landowner or land occupant is also a director, any landowner is qualified to and may receive assistance or loans under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 585, Sec. 10.   (AB 1902)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9413.

(a) Each district may develop a long-range work plan, annual work plan, and annual district report, as provided in this section. These plans and the annual district report shall address the full range of projects and programs pursuant to Section 9151 that are found to occur in the district.

(b) If a district develops a long-range work plan pursuant to subdivision (a), the long-range work plan shall be adopted and updated every five years. Districts may amend the long-range plan before the five-year update in order to address substantive changes occurring since the adoption of the most recent long-range work plan. A district that prepares long-range work plans shall provide, either in digital or hard-copy format, for
 informational purposes only, long-range work plans and updates to these plans to the boards of supervisors and to the boards and councils of other public agencies with jurisdiction over resource conservation and management of every county with land in the district’s jurisdiction. The long-range plans shall serve the following functions:

(1) Identification of resource issues within the district for purposes of local, state, and federal resource conservation planning.

(2) Establishment of long-range district goals.

(3) Provision of a framework for directors to identify priorities for annual district activities.

(4) Provision of information to federal, state, and local governments and the public concerning district programs and goals.

(5) Setting forth a basis for evaluating annual work plan achievements and allocating available funding to the district.

(6) Involvement of other agencies and organizations in the district planning process in order to help ensure support in implementing district plans.

(c) If a district develops an annual work plan pursuant to subdivision (a), the annual work plan shall be adopted on or before September 30 of each year in a format that shall be consistent with the district’s long-range work plan. A district that prepares annual work plans shall provide on an annual basis, either in digital or hard-copy format, for informational purposes only, annual work plans to the boards of supervisors and to the boards and councils of other public agencies with jurisdiction over resource conservation and management of every county
 with land in the district’s jurisdiction. The annual work plans shall serve the following functions:

(1) Identification of high priority actions to be undertaken by the district during the year covered by the plan.

(2) Identification of the person or persons responsible for undertaking each planned task, how it will be performed, when it will be completed, what constitutes completion, and the cost.

(3) Demonstration of the relationship of annual tasks to the long-range district goals identified in the long-range work plan.

(4) Provision of assistance to the local field office of the Natural Resources Conservation Service of the United States Department of Agriculture, and coordination of activities with the California Conservation Corps, and to the
 University of California Cooperative Extension, if applicable, in adjusting staff and program priorities to match district goals.

(5) Informing the public of the district’s goals for the year and the anticipated schedule of board of directors’ public meetings.

(6) Involvement of other agencies and organizations in the district planning process in order to help ensure support in implementing district plans.

(7) Provision of a basis for assisting the state in determining district eligibility for state funding under this division.

(d) If a district develops an annual district report pursuant to subdivision (a), the annual district report shall be completed on or before September 30 of each year in a format consistent with the long-range and annual plans,
 so that progress made during the reporting period towards district goals can be readily determined. The annual report shall serve the following functions:

(1) To report on the district’s achievements during the reporting period to the department, the board of supervisors and to the boards and councils of other public agencies with jurisdiction over resource conservation and management of land within the district’s jurisdiction of any county in which the district is located, and any agency that provides financial assistance.

(2) To increase public awareness of district activities.

(3) To compare district accomplishments during the reporting period with annual work plan objectives for that period and to identify potential objectives for the next annual work plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 585, Sec. 11.   (AB 1902)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9413.5.

Each district may enter into an interagency agreement with a state agency, for purposes of this chapter, consistent with the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 11250) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the Department of General Services’ State Contracting Manual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 585, Sec. 12.   (AB 1902)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9414.

The directors may accept, by purchase, lease, or gift, and administer any project or program consistent with Sections 9001 and 9151 located within the district undertaken by the United States or any of its agencies, or by this state or any of its agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 585, Sec. 13.   (AB 1902)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9415.

The directors may manage, as agents of the United States or any of its agencies, or of this state or any of its agencies, any project or program consistent with Sections 9001 and 9151, within or adjacent to the district; and may act as agent for the United States, or any of its agencies, or for this state or any of its agencies, in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation, or administration of any project or program consistent with Sections 9001 and 9151 within or adjacent to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 585, Sec. 14.   (AB 1902)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9416.

The directors may establish standards of cropping and tillage operations and range practices on private land as a condition to expenditure by the district of district or other funds, or to the doing by the district of any work of any nature, on private lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9417.

(a) The directors of any district may cooperate with the directors of any other district in respect to matters of common interest or benefit to the districts. An association of resource conservation districts may be organized to facilitate that cooperation, to provide for the loan of equipment and tools by one district to another, and for the making of investigations and studies and the carrying out of projects of joint interest to the districts participating therein. 

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage districts to organize in countywide or regional associations for the purposes of (1) providing coordinated representation of districts before federal, state, and local governmental agencies and (2) coordinating program planning, funding, and delivery of services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

9417.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that concerned state agencies, in cooperation with resource conservation districts and other appropriate local entities, work with the agencies of the United States Department of Agriculture and the Department of the Interior, the Environmental Protection Agency, and other federal agencies, to maximize cooperative opportunities for federal, state, and private funding for competitive grants and contracts for watershed protection, restoration, and enhancement programs of resource conservation districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 719, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

9418.

The directors of any district may call upon the district attorney of the principal county for legal advice and assistance in all matters concerning the district, except that if the principal county has a county counsel, then the directors shall call upon him for such legal advice and assistance. The district attorney or county counsel, as may be appropriate, shall, upon the request being made, give such advice and assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9419.

(a) The directors may engage in activities designed to promote a knowledge of the principles of resource conservation throughout the district and for that purpose may develop educational programs both for children and for adults. In the development of those programs, the directors may authorize the giving of awards and prizes for outstanding achievement. 

(b) Each district may develop and disseminate or utilize conservation education programs for use in kindergarten through grade 12. As an option to developing these programs independently, it is the intent of the Legislature to encourage both collaboration with other organizations and incorporation of elements of existing programs. 

(c) A district may conduct workshops on the relationships between soil and related resource problems and their effects on other resources, such as wildlife and water quality. 

(d) A district may sponsor programs that address land use practices which reduce water and wind erosion, soil contamination, soil salinity, agricultural land conversion, loss of soil organic matter, soil subsidence, and soil compaction and associated poor water infiltration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

9420.

The board of directors of a district may appoint advisory committees to provide technical assistance in addressing soil and related resource problems, to assist in coordinating conservation programs and activities, and to share information relating to the functions or purposes of the district. Representatives of state, federal, and local governmental agencies, including school districts, as well as private organizations, may serve on these advisory committees.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 831, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Property of District [9451. - 9457.]

9451.

The legal title to all property acquired by a district under the provisions of this division shall immediately and by operation of law vest in such district, and shall be held by such district for its uses and purposes under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9452.

The directors are hereby authorized and empowered to hold, use, acquire, manage, occupy and possess property of any kind, and may lease or sell it as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9453.

The directors may determine by resolution entered upon their minutes that any property, real or personal, held by such district is no longer necessary to be retained for the uses and purposes of the district, and may thereafter sell or lease such property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

9454.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in Section 9453, the directors may lease district equipment to any other public district for use by such public district for resource conservation purposes on land within the boundaries of a resource conservation district or on land adjacent to the district and under the jurisdiction of such other district, if such use will directly affect the land within the resource conservation district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 513.)